District of Columbia statutes.
38-1207.03

Conditions of enrollment.

All pertinent University rules and regulations, including, but not limited to, those relating to admission standards, shall apply to applicants for admission and to students already enrolled who are eligible for the tuition grant program outlined in § 38-1207.02.

History

Oct. 26, 1974, Pub. L. 93-471, title VII, § 703
as added Feb. 18, 1988, D.C. Law 7-74, § 2, 34 DCR 7946

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-1207.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1573.